Nebraska, session 109, LB773.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB773 LB773
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 68-9,106, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-9,106 The Nebraska Prenatal Plus Program is created within the
Department of Health and Human Services. The purpose of the Nebraska
Prenatal Plus Program is to reduce the incidence of low birth weight,
pre-term birth, and adverse birth outcomes while also addressing other
lifestyle, behavioral, and nonmedical aspects of an at-risk mother's life
that may affect the health and well-being of the mother or the child.
Program services shall be available to mothers up to and including, the
sixtieth day of the postpartum period. This program shall terminate on
June 30, 2028.
Sec. 2. Section 68-9,107, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-9,107 Services eligible for reimbursement for at-risk mothers
under the Nebraska Prenatal Plus Program include, but are not limited to:
(1) Six or fewer sessions of nutrition counseling; (2) psychosocial
counseling and support; (3) general client education and health
promotion; (4) a minimum of two breastfeeding support sessions; and (5)
targeted case management.
Sec. 3. Section 68-9,109, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
68-9,109 The Department of Health and Human Services shall
electronically submit a report to the Legislature on or before December
15 of each year beginning December 15, 2024, through December 15, 2034
2029, on the Nebraska Prenatal Plus Program which includes (1) the number
of mothers served, (2) the services offered, and (3) the birth outcomes
for each mother served.
Sec. 4. Original sections 68-9,106 and 68-9,107, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and section 68-9,109, Revised Statutes
Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-2-